Alaska, session 34, SB215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 (SECTION 1 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON PAGE 2) 01 * Section 1. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from the 02 general fund or other funds as set out in the fiscal year 2027 budget summary for the 03 operating budget by funding source to the agencies named for the purposes expressed for the 04 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, unless otherwise indicated. 05 Appropriation General Other 06 Allocations Items Funds Funds 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Administration * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Legal and Advocacy Services 4,318,500 3,894,900 423,600 11 Office of Public Advocacy 2,892,500 12 Public Defender Agency 1,426,000 13 * * * * * * * * * * 14 * * * * * Department of Corrections * * * * * 15 * * * * * * * * * * 16 Community Residential Centers 6,970,500 6,970,500 17 Community Residential 6,970,500 18 Centers 19 Health and Rehabilitation Services 10,209,500 9,707,800 501,700 20 Behavioral Health Care 8,565,600 21 Substance Abuse 1,643,900 22 Treatment Program 23 * * * * * * * * * * 24 * * * * * Department of Education and Early Development * * * * * 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 Education Support and Admin Services 532,200 377,800 154,400 27 Student and School 532,200 28 Achievement 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 * * * * * Department of Family and Community Services * * * * * 31 * * * * * * * * * * 01 At the discretion of the Commissioner of the Department of Family and Community Services, 02 up to $7,500,000 may be transferred between all appropriations in the Department of Family 03 and Community Services. 04 Alaska Psychiatric Institute 22,237,600 22,237,600 05 Alaska Psychiatric Institute 21,575,600 06 Facility Rent, Operations, 662,000 07 and Maintenance 08 Children's Services 2,226,900 2,226,900 09 Children's Services 69,500 10 Management 11 Front Line Social Workers 148,500 12 Family Preservation 726,000 13 Foster Care Augmented 500,000 14 Rate 15 Foster Care Special Need 782,900 16 Juvenile Justice 1,770,900 1,670,900 100,000 17 McLaughlin Youth Center 989,800 18 Fairbanks Youth Facility 143,300 19 Bethel Youth Facility 211,800 20 Probation Services 326,000 21 Juvenile Justice Health 100,000 22 Care 23 Departmental Support Services 8,288,300 7,799,000 489,300 24 Coordinated Health and 8,281,400 25 Complex Care 26 Commissioner's Office 6,900 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 At the discretion of the Commissioner of the Department of Health, up to $15,000,000 may be 31 transferred between all appropriations in the Department of Health. 01 Behavioral Health 54,062,700 52,253,100 1,809,600 02 Behavioral Health 32,904,100 03 Treatment and Recovery 04 Grants 05 Alcohol Safety Action 1,311,100 06 Program (ASAP) 07 Behavioral Health 10,220,300 08 Administration 09 Behavioral Health 5,987,300 10 Prevention and Early 11 Intervention Grants 12 Alaska Mental Health 1,036,300 13 Board and Advisory Board 14 on Alcohol and Drug Abuse 15 Suicide Prevention Council 626,200 16 Residential Child Care 1,614,400 17 Behavioral Health Facility 363,000 18 Operations and Maintenance 19 Health Care Services 283,000 283,000 20 Health Facilities Licensing 128,700 21 and Certification 22 The amount allocated for Health Facilities Licensing and Certification includes the 23 unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of general fund program receipts 24 collected for biennial license fees issued under AS 47.32.050. 25 Residential Licensing 154,300 26 Public Health 5,133,000 4,516,200 616,800 27 Women, Children and 2,181,000 28 Family Health 29 Emergency Programs 700 30 Chronic Disease Prevention 2,604,800 31 and Health Promotion 01 Bureau of Vital Statistics 74,500 02 Public Health Facility 272,000 03 Operations and Maintenance 04 Senior and Disabilities Services 12,589,200 10,786,300 1,802,900 05 Senior and Disabilities 1,180,600 06 Community Based Grants 07 Early Intervention/Infant 7,724,500 08 Learning Programs 09 Senior and Disabilities 2,155,900 10 Services Administration 11 General Relief/Temporary 740,300 12 Assisted Living 13 Commission on Aging 271,000 14 Governor's Council on 474,400 15 Disabilities and Special 16 Education 17 Senior and Disabilities 42,500 18 Services Facility Operations 19 and Maintenance 20 Medicaid Services 82,155,800 82,155,800 21 Medicaid Services 82,155,800 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 * * * * * Department of Labor and Workforce Development * * * * * 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 Commissioner and Administrative 25,900 25,900 26 Services 27 Labor Market Information 25,900 28 Vocational Rehabilitation 100,000 100,000 29 Vocational Rehabilitation 100,000 30 Administration 31 The amount allocated for Vocational Rehabilitation Administration includes the unexpended 01 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected 02 under the Department of Labor and Workforce Development's federal indirect cost plan for 03 expenditures incurred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. 04 * * * * * * * * * * 05 * * * * * Department of Law * * * * * 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 Civil Division 100,100 100,100 08 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 09 balance on June 30, 2026, of inter-agency receipts collected in the Department of Law's 10 federally approved cost allocation plan. 11 Health, Safety & Welfare 100,100 12 * * * * * * * * * * 13 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 14 * * * * * * * * * * 15 Administration & Support Services 6,438,200 6,438,200 16 Mental Health Trust Lands 5,542,400 17 Administration 18 Mental Health Trust Lands 895,800 19 Facility Operations and 20 Maintenance 21 * * * * * * * * * * 22 * * * * * Department of Public Safety * * * * * 23 * * * * * * * * * * 24 Alaska State Troopers 60,000 60,000 25 Alaska State Trooper 60,000 26 Detachments 27 Alaska Police Standards Council 80,000 80,000 28 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 29 balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected under AS 12.25.195(c), AS 12.55.039, 30 AS 28.05.151, and AS 29.25.074 and receipts collected under AS 18.65.220(7). 31 Alaska Police Standards 80,000 01 Council 02 Integrated Victim Assistance 1,617,500 1,617,500 03 Council on Domestic 1,617,500 04 Violence and Sexual Assault 05 * * * * * * * * * * 06 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority 6,718,500 787,100 5,931,400 09 Mental Health Trust 5,931,400 10 Operations 11 Long Term Care 787,100 12 Ombudsman Office 13 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation 200,000 200,000 14 AHFC Operations 200,000 15 * * * * * * * * * * 16 * * * * * University of Alaska * * * * * 17 * * * * * * * * * * 18 University of Alaska 3,431,800 805,800 2,626,000 19 Anchorage Campus 3,381,800 20 Troth Yeddha' Campus 50,000 21 * * * * * * * * * * 22 * * * * * Judiciary * * * * * 23 * * * * * * * * * * 24 Alaska Court System 634,800 532,800 102,000 25 Trial Courts 634,800 26 Therapeutic Courts 4,562,700 4,404,400 158,300 27 Therapeutic Courts 4,562,700 28 (SECTION 2 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 2. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Administration 05 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 3,894,900 06 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 423,600 07 Receipts 08 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $4,318,500 09 Department of Corrections 10 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 9,707,800 11 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 501,700 12 Receipts 13 1246 Recidivism Reduction Fund 6,970,500 14 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $17,180,000 15 Department of Education and Early Development 16 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 377,800 17 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 154,400 18 Receipts 19 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $532,200 20 Department of Family and Community Services 21 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 33,934,400 22 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 589,300 23 Receipts 24 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $34,523,700 25 Department of Health 26 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 118,963,000 27 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 4,229,300 28 Receipts 29 1180 Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Treatment & 20,100,000 30 Prevention Fund 31 1246 Recidivism Reduction Fund 4,412,000 01 1254 Marijuana Education and Treatment Fund 6,519,400 02 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $154,223,700 03 Department of Labor and Workforce Development 04 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 125,900 05 Receipts 06 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $125,900 07 Department of Law 08 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 100,100 09 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $100,100 10 Department of Natural Resources 11 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 6,438,200 12 Receipts 13 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $6,438,200 14 Department of Public Safety 15 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 140,000 16 Receipts 17 1246 Recidivism Reduction Fund 1,617,500 18 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $1,757,500 19 Department of Revenue 20 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 787,100 21 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 200,000 22 Receipts 23 1094 Mental Health Trust Administration 5,931,400 24 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $6,918,500 25 University of Alaska 26 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 805,800 27 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 2,626,000 28 Receipts 29 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $3,431,800 30 Judiciary 31 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 4,937,200 01 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 260,300 02 Receipts 03 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $5,197,500 04 * * * Total Budget * * * $234,747,600 05 (SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 3. The following appropriations are for capital projects and grants from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 4 of this Act by funding source to the agencies named for 03 the purposes expressed. They lapse under AS 37.25.020, unless otherwise noted. 04 Appropriation General Other 05 Allocations Items Funds Funds 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 MH Trust: Deferred Maintenance and 500,000 500,000 10 Accessibility Improvements (HD 1-40) 11 MH Trust: Home Modification and 1,150,000 1,150,000 12 Upgrades to Retain Housing (HD 1-40) 13 MH Trust: Person Centered 250,000 250,000 14 Transportation (HD 1-40) 15 MH Trust: Universal Changing Spaces 250,000 250,000 16 Assistance Fund (HD 1-40) 17 * * * * * * * * * * 18 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 19 * * * * * * * * * * 20 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation 21 MH Trust: AHFC Homeless Assistance 5,000,000 4,050,000 950,000 22 Program (HD 1-40) 23 MH Trust: AHFC Beneficiary and Special 1,950,000 1,750,000 200,000 24 Needs Housing (HD 1-40) 25 MH Trust: AHFC Rural Housing 135,000 135,000 26 Coordinator - Ketchikan (HD 1-40) 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 MH Trust: Coordinated Transportation 700,000 700,000 31 and Vehicles (HD 1-40) 01 (SECTION 4 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 4. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 3 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Health 05 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 1,150,000 06 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 1,000,000 07 Receipts 08 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $2,150,000 09 Department of Revenue 10 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 1,285,000 11 Receipts 12 1139 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Dividend 5,800,000 13 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $7,085,000 14 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 15 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 700,000 16 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $700,000 17 * * * Total Budget * * * $9,935,000 18 (SECTION 5 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 5. The following summarizes by fund source the funding for appropriations made in 02 secs. 1 and 3 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General Funds 05 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 175,358,100 06 1139 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Dividend 5,800,000 07 * * * Total Unrestricted General Funds * * * $181,158,100 08 Designated General Funds 09 1180 Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Treatment & 20,100,000 10 Prevention Fund 11 1246 Recidivism Reduction Fund 13,000,000 12 1254 Marijuana Education and Treatment Fund 6,519,400 13 * * * Total Designated General Funds * * * $39,619,400 14 Other Non-Duplicated Funds 15 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 17,973,700 16 Receipts 17 1094 Mental Health Trust Administration 5,931,400 18 * * * Total Other Non-Duplicated Funds * * * $23,905,100 19 Other Duplicated Funds 20 * * * Total Other Duplicated Funds * * * $0 21 Federal Receipts 22 * * * Total Federal Receipts * * * $0 23 * * * Total Budget * * * $244,682,600 24 (SECTION 6 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 6. PURPOSE. In accordance with AS 37.14.003 and 37.14.005, the appropriations 02 made in this Act are for the state's integrated comprehensive mental health program. 03 * Sec. 7. NONGENERAL FUND RECEIPTS. (a) Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority 04 authorized receipts (AS 37.14.036) or administration receipts (AS 37.14.036) that exceed the 05 amounts appropriated in this Act are appropriated conditioned upon compliance with the 06 program review provisions of AS 37.07.080(h). 07 (b) If Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority authorized receipts (AS 37.14.036) or 08 administration receipts (AS 37.14.036) fall short of the estimates used as the basis of the 09 appropriation, the affected appropriation is reduced by the amount of the shortfall in receipts. 10 * Sec. 8. SALARY AND BENEFIT ADJUSTMENTS. (a) The appropriations made in 11 sec. 1 of this Act include amounts for salary and benefit adjustments for public officials, 12 officers, and employees of the executive branch, Alaska Court System employees, employees 13 of the legislature, and legislators and to implement the monetary terms for the fiscal year 14 ending June 30, 2027, of the following ongoing collective bargaining agreements: 15 (1) Public Employees Local 71, for the labor, trades, and crafts unit; 16 (2) Alaska Public Employees Association, for the supervisory unit; 17 (3) Teachers' Education Association of Mt. Edgecumbe, representing the 18 teachers of Mt. Edgecumbe High School; 19 (4) Alaska Vocational Technical Center Teachers' Association, National 20 Education Association, representing the employees of the Alaska Vocational Technical 21 Center; 22 (5) International Organization of Masters, Mates, and Pilots, representing the 23 masters, mates, and pilots unit; 24 (6) Alaska State Employees Association, for the general government unit; 25 (7) Marine Engineers' Beneficial Association, representing licensed engineers 26 employed by the Alaska marine highway system; 27 (8) Confidential Employees Association, representing the confidential unit; 28 (9) Inlandboatmen's Union of the Pacific, Alaska Region, representing the 29 unlicensed marine unit. 30 (b) The appropriations made to the University of Alaska in sec. 1 of this Act include 31 amounts for salary and benefit adjustments to implement the monetary terms for the fiscal 01 year ending June 30, 2027, of the following collective bargaining agreements: 02 (1) Alaska Graduate Workers Association/UAW; 03 (2) United Academics - American Association of University Professors, 04 American Federation of Teachers; 05 (3) United Academic - Adjuncts - American Association of University 06 Professors, American Federation of Teachers. 07 (c) If a collective bargaining agreement listed in (a) of this section is not ratified by 08 the membership of the respective collective bargaining unit, the appropriations made in this 09 Act applicable to the collective bargaining unit's agreement are adjusted proportionately by 10 the amount for that collective bargaining agreement, and the corresponding funding source 11 amounts are adjusted accordingly. 12 (d) If a collective bargaining agreement listed in (b) of this section is not ratified by 13 the membership of the respective collective bargaining unit and approved by the Board of 14 Regents of the University of Alaska, the appropriations made in this Act applicable to the 15 collective bargaining unit's agreement are adjusted proportionately by the amount for that 16 collective bargaining agreement, and the corresponding funding source amounts are adjusted 17 accordingly. 18 (e) Appropriations made in sec. 1 of this Act for salary and benefit adjustments as 19 described in (a) and (b) of this section are for the benefit of the state's integrated 20 comprehensive mental health program only and do not necessarily affect every group of 21 noncovered employees or every collective bargaining unit listed in (a) and (b) of this section. 22 * Sec. 9. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.